South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S485.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-63-140 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (6) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a person seventy years of age or older who was born in the State of South Carolina and who has had his original certificate of birth sealed due to an adoption may, upon written request to the State Registrar, receive a copy of his original birth certificate and any evidence of the adoption held with the original record, regardless of the date on which the adoption was finalized. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----